Connecticut, session 2026, HB05421.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established a
separate, nonlapsing account to be known as the "health care facility
patient lift account". The account shall contain (1) any amounts
appropriated or otherwise made available by the state for the purposes
of this section, (2) any moneys required by law to be deposited in the
account, and (3) gifts, grants, donations or bequests made for the
purposes of this section. Investment earnings credited to the assets of
the account shall become part of the assets of the account. The State
Treasurer shall administer the account.
(b) All moneys deposited in the account shall be used by the
Department of Public Health for the purposes of this section. The
Commissioner of Public Health may deduct and retain from the moneys
in the account an amount equal to the costs incurred by the department
in administering the provisions of this section, except said amount shall
not exceed two per cent of the balance of the account in any fiscal year.
(c) The Commissioner of Public Health shall use the health care
facility patient lift account to make grants to offices of a practice of one

Substitute House Bill No. 5421
or more physicians licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the general
statutes, radiological facilities, imaging centers or health care facilities,
as defined in section 19a-490dd of the general statutes, to purchase
patient lifts to be used to transfer elderly persons, persons with
disabilities or persons with injuries or chronic health conditions from
facility beds to wheelchairs or other equipment. The commissioner shall
not make any grant that exceeds the balance available for grants in the
account.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 19, 2026
Public Act No. 26-36 2 of 2